Washington statutes.
RCW 39.28.020

Powers conferred.

Every municipality shall have power and is hereby authorized:

(1) To accept from any federal agency grants for or in aid of the construction of any public works project;

(2) To make contracts and execute instruments containing such terms, provisions, and conditions as in the discretion of the governing body of the municipality may be necessary, proper or advisable for the purpose of obtaining grants or loans, or both, from any federal agency pursuant to or by virtue of the Recovery Act; to make all other contracts and execute all other instruments necessary, proper or advisable in or for the furtherance of any public works project and to carry out and perform the terms and conditions of all such contracts or instruments;

(3) To subscribe to and comply with the Recovery Act and any rules and regulations made by any federal agency with regard to any grants or loans, or both, from any federal agency;

(4) To perform any acts authorized under RCW 39.28.010 through 39.28.030 through or by means of its own officers, agents and employees, or by contracts with corporations, firms or individuals;

(5) To award any contract for the construction of any public works project or part thereof upon any day at least fifteen days after one publication of a notice requesting bids upon such contract in a newspaper of general circulation in the municipality: PROVIDED, That in any case where publication of notice may be made in a shorter period of time under the provisions of existing statute or charter, such statute or charter shall govern;

(6) To sell bonds at private sale to any federal agency without any public advertisement;

(7) To issue interim receipts, certificates or other temporary obligations, in such form and containing such terms, conditions and provisions as the governing body of the municipality issuing the same may determine, pending the preparation or execution of definite bonds for the purpose of financing the construction of a public works project;

(8) To issue bonds bearing the signatures of officers in office on the date of signing such bonds, notwithstanding that before delivery thereof any or all the persons whose signatures appear thereon shall have ceased to be the officers of the municipality issuing the same;

(9) To include in the cost of a public works project which may be financed by the issuance of bonds: (a) Engineering, inspection, accounting, fiscal and legal expenses; (b) the cost of issuance of the bonds, including engraving, printing, advertising, and other similar expenses; (c) any interest costs during the period of construction of such public works project and for six months thereafter on money borrowed or estimated to be borrowed;

(10) To stipulate in any contract for the construction of any public works project or part thereof the maximum hours that any laborer, worker, or mechanic should be permitted or required to work in any one calendar day or calendar week or calendar month, and the minimum wages to be paid to laborers, workers, or mechanics in connection with any public works project: PROVIDED, That no such stipulation shall provide for hours in excess of or for wages less than may now or hereafter be required by any other law;

(11) To exercise any power conferred by RCW 39.28.010 through 39.28.030 for the purpose of obtaining grants or loans, or both, from any federal agency pursuant to or by virtue of the Recovery Act, independently or in conjunction with any other power or powers conferred by RCW 39.28.010 through 39.28.030 or heretofore or hereafter conferred by any other law;

(12) To do all acts and things necessary or convenient to carry out the powers expressly given in RCW 39.28.010 through 39.28.030.

[ 1989 c 12 s 12; 1937 c 107 s 3; RRS s 10322A-9. Prior: 1935 c 107 s 3; RRS s 10322A-3.]

NOTES:

Short title—Severability—1937 c 107: See notes following RCW 39.28.010.